Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-223
Medical examination as condition of employment; exemptions from sections.

The provisions of sections 48-220 to 48-223 shall not apply to any employment relationship entered into by the state or any subdivision of the state when a physical examination is required by law as a condition of employment.

Laws 1963, c. 280, § 4, p. 838.